Massachusetts, session 194th, S1273.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 103 of Chapter 54 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting at the end the following thereof:-- "Administrative decisions made by the Secretary of
State or any administrative body may be appealed to the Superior Courts.
of 1